Maryland, session 2025, SB0902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 661 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Insurance
15–830.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer that offers health insurance other than long–term
care insurance or disability insurance;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan;
(iii) a health maintenance organization;
(iv) a dental plan organization; or
(v) except for a managed care organization as defined in Title 15,
Subtitle 1 of the Health – General Article, any other person that provides health benefit
plans subject to State regulation.
(3) (i) “Member” means an individual entitled to health care benefits
under a policy or plan issued or delivered in the State by a carrier.
(ii) “Member” includes a subscriber.
(4) “Nonphysician specialist” means a health care provider:
(i) 1. who is not a physician;
2. who is licensed or certified under the Health Occupations
Article; and
3. who is certified or trained to treat or provide health care
services for a specified condition or disease in a manner that is within the scope of the
license or certification of the health care provider; or
(ii) that is licensed as a behavioral health program under § 7.5–401
of the Health – General Article.
(5) (i) “Provider panel” means the providers that contract with a carrier
either directly or through a subcontracting entity to provide health care services to
enrollees of the carrier.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 661
(ii) “Provider panel” does not include an arrangement in which any
provider may participate solely by contracting with the carrier to provide health care
services at a discounted fee–for–service rate.
(6) “Specialist” means a physician who is certified or trained to practice in
a specified field of medicine and who is not designated as a primary care provider by the
carrier.
(d) (1) Each carrier shall establish and implement a procedure by which a
member may request a referral to a specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not part of
the carrier’s provider panel in accordance with this subsection.
(2) The procedure shall provide for a referral to a specialist or nonphysician
specialist who is not part of the carrier’s provider panel if:
(i) 1. the member is diagnosed with OR SEEKING CARE FOR a
condition or disease that requires specialized health care services or medical care; and
(ii) 1. 2. A. the carrier does not have in its provider panel a
specialist or nonphysician specialist with the professional training and expertise to treat or
provide health care services for the condition or disease; or
2. B. the carrier cannot provide reasonable access to a specialist
or nonphysician specialist with the professional training and expertise to treat or provide
health care services for the condition or disease [without unreasonable delay or travel],
INCLUDING WITHIN THE REASONABLE APPOINTMENT WAITING TIME AND TRAVEL
DISTANCE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN REGULATION FOR MENTAL HEALTH AND
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SERVICES; OR
(II) 1. THE MEMBER IS SEEKING MENTAL HEALTH OR
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER CARE; AND
2. THE CARRIER CANNOT PROVIDE REASONABLE
ACCESS TO A SPECIALIST OR NONPHYSICIAN SPECIALIST WITHIN THE REASONABLE
APPOINTMENT WAITING TIME AND TRAVEL DISTANCE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN
REGULATION FOR MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SERVICES.
(3) The procedure shall ensure that a request to obtain a referral to a
specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not part of the carrier’s provider panel is
addressed in a timely manner that is:
(i) appropriate for the member’s condition; and
(ii) in accordance with the timeliness requirements for
determinations made by private review agents under § 15–10B–06 of this title.
– 3 –

Ch. 661 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) IF A MEMBER CANNOT ACCESS MENTAL HEALTH OR SUBSTANCE
USE DISORDER SERVICES THROUGH THE REFERRAL REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PROCEDURE SHALL REQUIRE
THE CARRIER TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL ASSISTANCE TO THE MEMBER IN
IDENTIFYING AND ARRANGING COVERAGE OF MENTAL HEALTH OR SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER SERVICES BY A SPECIALIST OR NONPHYSICIAN SPECIALIST WHO IS NOT
PART OF THE CARRIER’S PROVIDER PANEL.
(5) THE PROCEDURE MAY NOT REQUIRE PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FOR
PURPOSES OF:
(I) SCHEDULING AN APPOINTMENT WITH A SPECIALIST OR
NONPHYSICIAN SPECIALIST WHO IS NOT PART OF THE CARRIER’S PROVIDER PANEL;
(II) REIMBURSING A SPECIALIST OR NONPHYSICIAN SPECIALIST
WHO IS NOT PART OF THE CARRIER’S PROVIDER PANEL; OR
(III) CONTINUING AN ESTABLISHED TREATMENT PLAN WITH A
SPECIALIST OR NONPHYSICIAN SPECIALIST WHO IS NOT PART OF THE CARRIER’S
PROVIDER PANEL IF A CARRIER APPROVES A MEMBER’S REQUEST FOR A REFERRAL
MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THE CARRIER MAY NOT REQUIRE
UTILIZATION REVIEW OTHER THAN WHAT WOULD BE REQUIRED IF THE COVERED
BENEFIT WERE PROVIDED BY A PROVIDER ON THE CARRIER’S PROVIDER PANEL.
[(4)] (6) The procedure may not be used by a carrier as a substitute for
establishing and maintaining a sufficient provider network in accordance with § 15–112 of
this title.
[(5)] (7) Each carrier shall:
(i) have a system in place that documents all requests to obtain a
referral to receive a covered service from a specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not
part of the carrier’s provider panel;
(ii) inform members of the procedure to request a referral under
paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
(iii) provide the information documented under item (i) of this
paragraph to the Commissioner on request.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for purposes of
calculating any deductible, copayment amount, or coinsurance payable by the member, a
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 661
carrier shall treat services received in accordance with subsection (d) of this section as if
the service was provided by a provider on the carrier’s provider panel.
(2) A carrier shall ensure that services received in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section for mental health or substance use disorders are provided FOR
THE DURATION OF THE TREATMENT PLAN at no greater cost to the covered individual
than if the covered benefit were provided by a provider on the carrier’s provider panel.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AND
NOT LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2026, THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION
SHALL ESTABLISH A REIMBURSEMENT FORMULA TO DETERMINE THE
REIMBURSEMENT RATE FOR NONPARTICIPATING PROVIDERS WHO DELIVER
SERVICES UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION SHALL HOLD
PUBLIC MEETINGS WITH CARRIERS, MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER PROVIDERS, CONSUMERS OF MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER SERVICES, AND OTHER INTERESTED PARTIES TO DETERMINE THE
REIMBURSEMENT FORMULA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 271 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2022. [It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2025,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.]
Chapter 272 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2022. [It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2025,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2026.
– 5 –

Ch. 661 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –